District of Columbia statutes.
1-807.06

Termination of Trust Fund.

Effective upon the transfer of the obligations and assets of the Trust Fund to the D.C. Federal Pension Fund under § 1-817.03:

(1)

The Trust Fund shall terminate; and

(2)

The obligation to make Federal benefit payments from the Trust Fund, and any duty imposed on any person with respect to the Trust Fund, shall terminate.

Aug. 5, 1997, 111 Stat. 724, Pub. L. 105-33, § 11036
as added Dec. 23, 2004, 118 Stat. 3969, Pub. L. 108-489, § 2(b)(1)